North Carolina, session 2025, HB294.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Section 5(a) of S.L. 2024-14 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 5.(a) The Jackson County Board of Education shall consist of five members
elected from five single-member residency districts to serve staggered four-year terms. One
member shall be elected from each residency district by the qualified voters of the entire county.
No person shall be eligible to file or be elected to the Jackson County Board of Education unless
the person is a qualified voter and resident of the residency district in which the candidate seeks
to be elected. Elections for the Jackson County Board of Education shall be held in
even-numbered years at the time of the general election with results determined by the
nonpartisan plurality method in accordance with G.S. 163-292. on a partisan basis as terms
expire. Candidates for election to the Jackson County Board of Education shall be nominated at
the same time and manner as other county officers. Members shall take office on the first Monday
in December following the election. Members shall serve until a successor has been elected and
qualified. Except as otherwise provided by this section, the election shall be conducted in
accordance with the applicable provisions of Chapter 115C and 163 of the General Statutes. All
vacancies on the Jackson County Board of Education shall be filled in accordance with
G.S. 115C-37.1."
SECTION 2. This act does not affect the term of office of any member elected in
2024 to the Jackson County Board of Education. Any vacancy on the Jackson County Board of
Education for a member elected in 2024 shall be filled by appointment by the remaining members
of the Jackson County Board of Education to serve the remainder of the unexpired term. Each
member of the Jackson County Board of Education elected in 2024, or any member appointed to
fill a vacancy in 2024, shall serve until a successor has been elected and qualified.
SECTION 3. G.S. 115C-37.1(d) reads as rewritten:
"(d) This section shall apply only to the Hickory City Board of Education and the
Newton-Conover City Board of Education and in the following counties: Alleghany, Ashe,
Beaufort, Brunswick, Burke, Cabarrus, Caldwell, Carteret, Catawba, Cherokee, Clay, Craven,
Dare, Davie, Forsyth, Graham, Harnett, Henderson, Hyde, Iredell, Jackson, Lee, Lincoln,
Madison, McDowell, Mitchell, New Hanover, Onslow, Pamlico, Pender, Polk, Rutherford,
Stanly, Stokes, Surry, Vance, Washington, and Yancey."
SECTION 4. This act becomes effective the first Monday in December of 2026, and
elections in 2026 and thereafter shall be conducted accordingly.
*H294-v-2*